California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 7.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19152.

(a) “Community rehabilitation program” means a program which is operated for the primary purpose of providing directly or facilitating the provision of vocational rehabilitation services to persons with disabilities and which provides singly or in combination one or more of the following services to enable persons with disabilities to maximize opportunities for employment, including career advancement:

(1) Comprehensive rehabilitation services which shall include, under one management, medical, psychological, social, and vocational services.

(2) Testing, fitting, or training in the use of prosthetic and orthotic devices.

(3) Recreational therapy.

(4) Physical and occupational therapy.

(5) Speech, language, and hearing therapy.

(6) Psychiatric, psychological, and social services.

(7) Personal and work adjustment.

(8) Vocational training (in combination with other rehabilitation services).

(9) Evaluation or control of special disabilities.

(10) Assessment for determining eligibility and vocational needs, including evaluation for supported employment, development, and placement in jobs.

(11) Development of, and placement in, jobs.

(12) Job coaching services to enable a person with disabilities to obtain or maintain supported or competitive employment.

(13) Extended employment for persons with
 significant disabilities who cannot be readily absorbed into the competitive labor market.

(14) Personal assistance services.

(15) To the extent provided under federal law, services similar to the services described in paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive.

(b) All medical and related health services shall be prescribed by, or under the formal supervision of, persons licensed to practice medicine or surgery in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 8.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19153.

The term, “blind person” means either a person who has not more than 20/200 central visual acuity in the better eye after correction, or a person who has visual acuity greater than 20/200 but with a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees. Such blindness shall be certified by a licensed physician and surgeon who specializes in diseases of the eye or a licensed optometrist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19154.

Establishment of a community rehabilitation program means the acquisition, expansion, remodeling, or alteration of existing buildings necessary to adapt them to community rehabilitation program purposes or to increase their effectiveness for such purposes (subject, however, to such limitations as the federal government or the director may, by regulation, prescribe in order to prevent impairment of the objectives of, or duplication of, other laws providing assistance in the construction of such facilities for community rehabilitation programs), and may include additional equipment and staffing permitted by federal law or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 21.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Deaf Persons [19200. - 19200.]

19200.

The department is authorized to pay for training and support services for deaf students in a public or private college or university approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Rehabilitation Facilities [19400. - 19471.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19400. - 19404.]

19400.

It is the purpose of this chapter to extend the opportunities for individuals with disabilities for employment through encouragement of local communities to develop rehabilitation programs and to provide the state with information concerning their effectiveness in providing employment and rehabilitation services to individuals with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 23.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

The department may provide consultive services to organizations in the establishment and operation of community rehabilitation programs for individuals with disabilities. These consultive service shall include the bringing together of persons interested in the established community rehabilitation programs, surveying community needs, securing the cooperation of other community agencies, planning methods of financing, securing work contracts, establishing professional standards, and maintaining of appropriate records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 24.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

The department may contract with qualified persons or firms for consultation in such technical fields as accounting, engineering and sales so that the directors and governing bodies of the community rehabilitation programs may be advised as to the desirability of any undertaking and the best methods of achieving their objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 25.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage state organizations, cities, counties, districts, and other political subdivisions to purchase products manufactured by and services provided by public or private nonprofit California corporations operating workshops serving individuals with disabilities whenever it is feasible to do so and the proximity of the public or private nonprofit California corporations operating workshops serving individuals with disabilities makes the purchases reasonably convenient and to provide equality of competitive advantage for organizations operating workshops for individuals with disabilities and organizations operating workshops for individuals who are blind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 26.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19404.

Any state agency, city or county, political subdivision, or district of this state may, without advertising or calling for bids, purchase materials and supplies manufactured and services provided by public or private nonprofit California corporations operating community rehabilitation programs serving persons with disabilities who have indicated an interest in supplying those goods and services and may, on an equitable basis apportion the business among the interested community rehabilitation programs, provided the goods or services meet the specifications and needs of the purchasing agency and are purchased at a fair market price, as determined by the appropriate state or local agency and provided that the public or private nonprofit California corporations comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) (1) Contract work obtained under this section shall be performed by a labor force which is comprised primarily of persons with disabilities, as measured by the percentage of person-hours of direct labor devoted to the contract work. 

(2) For purposes of this paragraph, “primarily” means 75 percent or greater. 

(3) Agree to make those elections permitted of any nonprofit corporation under the federal Insurance Contributions Act and the California Unemployment Insurance Code in order to provide social security and unemployment and disability benefits for its employees commencing with its first contract or purchase order under this section and continuing thereafter. In the event that the nonprofit corporation ceases to provide those benefits, any existing contract or purchase order under this section with the corporation is terminated and no further contracts or purchase orders shall be awarded to that corporation for the period of two years after the corporation ceases to provide the benefits. For the purposes of this subdivision, a person with a disability shall be considered an employee when performing productive work. 

(4) Provide in its articles of incorporation that at least two of the directors of its board of directors shall be comprised of persons with disabilities or the parents, guardians, or conservators of individuals with disabilities. Directors who are also employees of the nonprofit corporation shall not participate in or be present at discussions of the board of directors concerned with labor-management contract negotiations. 

(5) Provide for disabled employees of the nonprofit corporation benefits and other employer-employee agreements substantially equal to those benefits and agreements entered into between each nonprofit corporation and the representatives designated by a majority of the employees. 

(6) Not commit any unfair labor practices as defined in Section 8(a) of the National Labor Relations Act. 

(7) Abide by the provisions of the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act, the Walsh-Healy Public Contract Act, the Wagner O’Day Act, and the regulations of the State Division of Industrial Welfare. 

(b) For purposes of this section a “person with a disability” means any person, other than a person who is blind, who is so severely incapacitated by any physical or mental disability that he or she cannot currently engage in normal competitive employment because of the disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 27.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transportation and Assistive Technology Loan Guarantees [19460. - 19471.]

19460.

(a) There is in the State Treasury a permanent revolving fund to be known as the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund, and to be administered by the department. The money deposited in the fund, including, but not limited to, money in any previously established account within the fund, is hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes of this article. The fund shall be used to guarantee loans made by eligible lenders to eligible persons for the purchase of vans, automobiles, and other special equipment to facilitate transportation of individuals with disabilities, and to assist private employers and employees, and other persons regardless of age, with disabilities to purchase assistive technology in order to live more independently or to engage in employment, including, but not limited to, supported employment as defined and determined by the department.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate the requirement that employers comply with reasonable accommodations and related responsibilities pursuant to federal and state laws. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a loan guarantee for individuals with disabilities who have previously received vocational rehabilitation services and who wish to obtain a loan to purchase newly developed assistive technology or to replace worn or obsolete assistive technology.

(c) In determining eligibility for a loan guarantee from this account, the department shall make any loan guarantee contingent upon a determination that the person or the family of a child reasonably can be expected to repay the loan based on the person’s or family’s expected income or other resources.

(d) To the extent possible, loans made pursuant to this chapter shall provide for a security interest to be given the lending institution in the vehicle or assistive technology for which the loan is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, second Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19461.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Rehabilitation.

(b) “Eligible persons” means any of the following, provided that household income does not exceed the level prescribed for moderate-income families by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code:

(1) Parents of a child with a disability who has been certified by a physician or the department as having a disability, who is living in the home, and who requires a modified vehicle for mobility.

(2) A person with a disability who has been certified by a physician or the department as having a disability, and who requires a modified vehicle for mobility.

(3) Parents of a child with a disability who has been certified by a physician or the department as having a disability, who is living in the home, and who requires assistive technology, including evaluation and training in the use of an assistive technology device, which is necessary for independent living.

(4) A person with a disability who has been certified by a physician or the department as having a disability, and who requires assistive technology, including evaluation and training in the use of an assistive technology device, which is necessary for independent living.

(c) “Eligible lender” means a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under a law of this state or the United States to make loans or extend credit and subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or the United States.

(d) “Assistive technology” means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of individuals with disabilities, and any service that directly assists an individual with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use of the item, equipment, or product system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19462.

The department shall serve as a state loan guarantee agency to guarantee loans and to administer a guaranteed loan program established pursuant to this article. The department shall guarantee any loan made pursuant to this article at 100 percent of the total amount of principal and interest of the loan in default. The department shall establish the ratio of reserve funds to loans outstanding. The effective interest rate to the borrower shall be a percent per annum, which is less than the fair market interest rate at the time the loan guarantee request is considered by the department, and which is based upon the ability of the borrower to pay, as determined by the department. When an application for a loan guarantee is approved by the department, the differential interest between the percent per annum approved by the department and the rate charged by the participating lender shall be prepaid by the department to the participating lender out of the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund. If the borrower defaults on any loan guaranteed by this program, the participating lender shall reimburse the department for any interest not accrued, after deduction for any unavoidable loss suffered by the lender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19463.

State guaranteed loans made pursuant to this article shall be made without regard to race, religion, creed, or sex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19464.

The total amount of all outstanding debts, obligations, and liabilities which may be incurred or created under this article is limited to the amount contained in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund, and the state shall not be liable beyond the amount contained in such fund for such debts, obligations, and liabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19465.

In the event that the amount of loans applied for under this article exceeds the amount of the loans that may be guaranteed pursuant to this article, the department may establish a system of priorities for the approval of loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19466.

The State Treasurer shall invest, pursuant to statute, any surplus money in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund. The interest or other accretions as a result of the investment of such money shall accrue to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19467.

The funds in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund shall be paid out by the State Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Controller and requisitioned by the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19468.

The department shall encourage private eligible lenders to participate in the guaranteed loan program established by this article, and shall develop and distribute in cooperation with private eligible lenders consumer information for prospective borrowers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19469.

No loan in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be made to any eligible person pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19470.

The department shall adopt regulations not inconsistent with this article that, among other things, shall establish criteria for determining eligibility for loans in the guarantee program that ensure that the applicants have the ability to repay the loans

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19471.

(a) The department may apply for a federal grant award through the federal alternative financing program established pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 3003 of Title 29 of the United States Code and may use funds in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund, established pursuant to Section 19460, as the match for these federal grant funds. The department may comply with applicable federal grant requirements, including, to the extent required, contracting with a community-based, nonprofit organization that has individuals with disabilities involved in the organization decisionmaking at all organizational levels, to administer the alternative financing program.

(b) The department may do all of the following:

(1) Select a community-based organization with which to contract based upon consideration of criteria, including, but not limited to, the organization’s sound fiscal condition and internal controls.

(2) Monitor and audit performance by the organization under the contract to minimize the risk of loss to the loan guarantee program of loan defaults.

(3) Terminate the contract in the event the department determines that the organization has not complied with the contract terms or has not prudently administered the loan guarantee funds.

(c) Moneys received from a federal alternative financing grant shall be deposited in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund established pursuant to Section 19460, and the federal funds and state matching funds shall be administered by the department and, as set forth in subdivision (a), by a community-based organization through a contract with the department, for the purpose of providing loan guarantees consistent with this article and applicable federal grant requirements.

(d) To the extent that state funds in the Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Guarantee Fund are not used to fund the alternative financing program, the department shall administer any remaining money in the fund consistent with the provisions of this article, and may enter into contracts with any public or private entity for the provision of services relating to the administration of the loan guarantee program.

(e) No more than 10 percent of the fund, excluding funds held in reserve pursuant to Section 19462, per fiscal year, may be used for costs of administration of the loan guarantee program, including administrative costs incurred by the department and any contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 549, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Blind Persons [19500. - 19652.]



  ARTICLE 1. Orientation Centers [19500. - 19507.]

19500.

The department may establish orientation centers for the blind in such locations as may be deemed necessary to provide on a statewide basis the services to be rendered by orientation centers as provided in this article. Such orientation centers as may be established shall be under the jurisdiction and supervision of the department and shall be administered by the Director of Rehabilitation in accordance with the provisions of this article. The department shall make and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary for the administration of such orientation centers in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19501.

Each orientation center established under Sections 19500 to 19506, inclusive, shall be residential in character. Blind persons shall be admitted as residents and trainees in an intensive program designed for maximum vocational and personal rehabilitation and for the preparation of blind persons for useful and remunerative work in trades, professions, private business, private industry, or public service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

Orientation centers shall provide for short periods of intensive personal and prevocational orientation for blind persons, and for specific vocational training. The program of orientation centers shall include such training as techniques of daily living, techniques of travel, physical conditioning, sensory training, instruction in braille, instruction in skills for persons with disabilities, typing, and business principles and methods, and shall provide for social and vocational diagnostic testing and individual counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 8.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19503.

The Director of Rehabilitation shall appoint an administrator for each orientation center for the blind who shall administer and supervise the program at the center in accordance with this article and under the supervision of the Director of Rehabilitation. The administrator of each orientation center for the blind shall be either a sighted or visually impaired person and shall have all of the following minimum qualifications:

(a) Four years of full time, paid experience working in a program for the education or rehabilitation of adults who
 are legally blind, with emphasis on nonvisual living techniques, including, but not limited to, daily living, mobility, and communication skills. At least two years’ experience shall have been in a supervisory or administrative capacity.

(b) Proficiency in Braille as a second language.

(c) Education equivalent to graduation from college with a bachelor’s degree. Additional qualifying experience may be substituted on a year-for-year basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.

The staff of an orientation center shall be composed of persons trained to assist blind persons in achieving social and economic independence, and whose qualifications include successful experience in teaching blind persons. The staff shall include as large a proportion as is practicable of visually impaired persons who have achieved outstanding success in adjustment to their disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 10.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19505.

Each orientation center shall be operated as a unit separate and apart from any state-operated rehabilitation facility. The program of each orientation center shall be closely coordinated with the services of the department, with the home teacher and field service program, and with programs for training teachers and other personnel directed toward serving the blind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19506.

The department may:

(a) Make rules for the government and direction of orientation centers established under this article, and may prescribe conditions for the admission and discharge of trainees having regard to an equitable representation from each county of the state.

(b) Designate the subjects which shall be regularly taught and the training which shall be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19507.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the department, in accordance with Section 19007, is the authorized recipient of gifts, bequests, and donations made to the department or to a school or institution administered by the department.

(b) There is, within the State Treasury, the Orientation Center for the Blind Trust Fund, which is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for allocation to the Orientation Center for the Blind exclusively for the purposes specified in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) Moneys in the Orientation Center for the Blind Trust Fund shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, funding of services provided by the department, and shall be utilized only in accordance with the terms and conditions of the gifts or donations made to the fund and for the sole purpose of the betterment of the students of the program at the Orientation Center for the Blind.

(2) The department shall consult with the Orientation Center for the Blind Trust Fund Committee, which shall be created by the director, concerning the use of moneys in the fund.

(3) The Orientation Center for the Blind Trust Fund Committee shall be composed of three members, all of whom shall be graduates of the Orientation Center for the Blind. The director shall consider for appointment to the committee individuals who are members of groups of advocates for the blind. No more than one member of any group shall be appointed, and appointment shall be from a list of at least two nominees submitted by the group. The director shall appoint one member to be an at-large representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Services for Persons with Vision Loss [19510. - 19510.]

19510.

(a) The Department of Rehabilitation shall establish a grant program to provide services to promote independent living to adults who are blind or have low vision, and who are not eligible to receive vocational rehabilitation services pursuant to the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.). The services shall assist adults who are blind or have low vision, including those individuals who may be at risk of institutionalization or who wish to transition into the community from an institutionalized setting, to receive vision rehabilitation services that will enable them to live independently.

(b) The department shall implement the program subject to an appropriation of funds in the annual Budget Act for
 purposes of this program, or through the use of any other funds already made available for the purposes described in this article, including any funding available pursuant to Sections 19525 and 19526.

(c) To implement the program, the department shall award grants to private organizations with demonstrated expertise in serving adults who are blind or have low vision. The department may select private organizations awarded grants under the most recent solicitation of grantees under the state’s Older Individuals who are Blind program without using a competitive awards process.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Adult” means an individual 18 years of age or older.

(2) “Services” means independent living services as
 described in Section 367.3(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations that are appropriate for adults who are blind regardless of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 532, Sec. 2.   (AB 2480)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Field Orientation Services for the Blind [19525. - 19526.]

19525.

The department may appoint counselor-teachers to provide individual guidance and training to adult individuals who are blind. The counselor-teachers shall give individual instruction in those techniques that will enable adult individuals who are blind to adjust to daily living in the home and in the community.
 A counselor-teacher shall teach an adult individual who is blind reading and writing of braille, travel techniques, and independent living skills, and provide assistive technology training, in accordance with the needs of the adult individual who is blind, and give them
 other instruction as may enhance their opportunities for personal rehabilitation. This program shall be closely coordinated with vocational rehabilitation services for adult individuals who are blind and the Orientation Center for the Blind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (AB 2480)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19526.

(a) Whenever a blind person who has the proper educational qualifications regularly matriculates, enters, and works for a degree, or for a diploma of graduation, in any university, college, or state college in this state, and who is not a recipient of federally assisted vocational
 rehabilitation services, the Director of Rehabilitation shall provide from any funds appropriated for this purpose from the General Fund a reader to assist the individual in their studies.

(b) A reader whose services are provided pursuant to this section shall be deemed an independent contractor whose services shall have been contracted by the Director of Rehabilitation for the benefit of the blind person, and the reader shall not be an employee of the Department of Rehabilitation. Compensation for readers shall be established at a rate high enough to obtain competent readers but in no event shall
 the compensation be less than the basic federal minimum wage. No more than 1,100 hours of service by a reader per annum shall be allowed for the instruction of any one student, except that for graduate students not more than 1,300 hours of service by a reader shall be allowed for the instruction of any one student, provided that a greater amount may be expended if the Director of Rehabilitation finds that the instruction of a student will be facilitated by the additional expenditure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 532, Sec. 4.   (AB 2480)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Business Enterprises for the Blind [19625. - 19641.]

19625.

For the purpose of providing blind persons with remunerative employment, enlarging the economic opportunities of the blind, and stimulating the blind to greater efforts in striving to make themselves self-supporting, blind persons licensed under this article shall be authorized to operate vending facilities on any property within this state as provided in this article. In order to administer this article, the director shall establish and promote the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 107 et. seq.), and the federal regulations for its administration set forth in Part 395 (commencing with Section 395.1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall serve as minimum standards for the operation of the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind.

(a) With respect to vending facilities on state property, priority shall be given to blind persons, including the assignment of vending machine income as provided in this article. As used in this article, “state property” means all real property, or part thereof, owned, leased, rented, or otherwise controlled or occupied by any department or other agency or body of this state.

(b) With respect to vending on federal property within this state, priority shall be given as provided in the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 107 et seq.), including the amendments thereto. This article, as it applies to federal property, is intended to conform to that act and is to be of no force or effect if, and to the extent that, any provision of this article or any regulation adopted under this article is in conflict with that act. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impose limitations on the operation of vending facilities on state property, or property other than federal property, or to allow only those activities specifically enumerated in the Randolph-Sheppard Act.

(c) On all other property within this state, whether owned or controlled privately or by any county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision, the department shall take all feasible steps to encourage and establish vending by blind persons licensed under this article. The department may enter into appropriate agreements with the entities or persons owning or controlling the other property. All these agreements shall be in writing and shall be in conformity with this article.

(d) The director shall actively pursue all commissions from vending facilities not operated by blind vendors as provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 19630, and shall seek new placements of vending facilities on state property where a facility is not yet in place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19625.5.

The department shall support and encourage all participants in the Business Enterprises Program to be as successful at becoming self-supporting as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

19626.

A “vending facility” is a location which may sell, at wholesale or retail, foods, beverages, confections, newspapers, periodicals, tobacco products, and other articles or services dispensed automatically or manually and prepared on or off the premises in accordance with applicable health laws.

A “vending facility” may consist, exclusively or in appropriate combination, of automatic vending machines, cafeterias, snackbars, catering or food concession vehicles, cart service, shelters, counters and any appropriate equipment as the director may by regulation prescribe as being necessary for the sale of the articles or services described in the first paragraph of this section.

A “vending facility” may encompass more than one building.

Licensed blind vendors shall not be required to purchase supplies or services from wholesalers who may be licensed under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19626.5.

(a) The department shall develop and promulgate regulations regarding life standards for vending facility equipment. These regulations shall include, but not be limited to, life expectancy of equipment, time periods within which equipment shall be replaced, and exceptions to the requirement of replacement of equipment within the specified time periods, including when there is a history of no service problems. These regulations shall also provide for exceptions to the life standard or life expectancy policies allowing earlier replacement under certain circumstances including excessive mechanical failures or other malfunction that is not the fault of the operator.

(b) The department, in administering the Business Enterprises Program, shall consult with the Department of General Services and develop a system of expediting equipment orders to ensure timely delivery, thereby reducing financial hardship to vendors and allowing provision of continuous food service as required by the contracting agency. This system shall not preclude the Department of General Services from exercising oversight and review of the purchasing process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19627.

(a) In order to implement the priority declared in subdivision (a) of Section 19625, the director shall, in consultation with the committee of licensed blind vendors, and after consultation with and agreement by the Director of General Services and other heads of departments or agencies in control of the maintenance, operation, and protection of state property, develop regulations designed to ensure the following:

(1) That priority is given to blind persons licensed under this article, including the assignment of vending machine income as provided in this article.

(2) That one or more vending facilities shall be established on all state property to the extent that any facility or facilities is feasible. Where a larger vending facility is not feasible, the director shall take steps to place vending machines whenever possible. In determining feasibility the director shall consider, but is not limited to consideration of, all of the following:

(A) The number of state employees in the building or on the state property.

(B) The size, in square feet, of the area leased, occupied, owned, or otherwise controlled by the state.

(C) The length of time the property will be leased or occupied by the state. 

(D) Whether establishment of a vending facility would adversely affect the interests of the state.

(E) The likelihood the vending facility will produce sufficient net income for a blind vendor as provided in Section 19631.

(b) Any decision that the placement or operation of a vending facility is not feasible, or that placement or operation would adversely affect the interests of the state shall be in writing, and shall be made available to the committee of licensed blind vendors.

(c) The Director of General Services is authorized to construct and install or permit the construction and installation of a vending facility on any property owned or occupied by the state. In the case of leased space, costs shall be shared by agencies occupying the space as determined by the Director of General Services.

(d) The director is authorized, subject to regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (a) and the requirements of the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act, to select a location for a facility and the type of facility to be provided.

(e) Immediately upon receipt of notification from any state department or agency, the Department of General Services, Office of Real Estate and Design Services shall provide written notice to the director of the plans of any state department or agency to occupy, acquire, renovate, or relocate a property. This notice shall permit the director to determine in accordance with regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (a) whether the property includes, or will include, a satisfactory site or sites for a vending facility.
